District of Columbia statutes.
1-626.05

District retirement benefits program.

The retirement benefits program of the District shall consist of:

(1)

A defined benefit plan, as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq. (“Social Security Act”);

(2)

An employee deferred compensation plan pursuant to § 457 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 457] governed by Chapter 36 of Title 47; and

(3)

A defined contribution plan pursuant to § 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 401].

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2605
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(g), 34 DCR 5079
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 10(b), 35 DCR 147
This section is referenced in § 1-626.04, § 1-626.06, § 1-626.07, § 1-626.08, § 1-626.09, § 1-626.10, § 1-626.11, and § 1-626.12.
1981 Ed., § 1-627.5.

Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in paragraph (2), is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 457.

Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in paragraph (3), is classified as 26 U.S.C. § 401(a).

Establishment of Pension Benefit Committee: See Mayor’s Order 89-235, October 5, 1989.